District of Columbia statutes.
5-607

Effect of chapter on other rights of recovery.

No action taken by the District of Columbia in connection with the rights afforded under this chapter shall operate to deny to the injured or diseased policeman or fireman recovery for any damages or portion thereof not covered by this chapter.

Aug. 17, 1978, D.C. Law 2-100, § 8, 25 DCR 288
1973 Ed., § 4-1007.
1981 Ed., § 4-507.